Utah statutes.
4-11-9.   Inspection of apiaries where queen bees raised for sale -- Honey from apiaries where queen bees raised for sale not to be used for candy for mailing cages unless boiled.

(1) (a)  At least twice each summer the county bee inspector shall inspect each apiary in which queen bees are raised for sale. 

(b)  A person may not sell or transport any queen bee from an apiary that is found to be infected with disease, without the consent of the county bee inspector or the department.

(2)  No person engaged in raising queen bees for sale shall use any honey for making candy for mailing cages that has not been boiled for at least 30 minutes.

(3)  A person rearing queens shall follow standard methods for minimizing or eliminating unmanageably aggressive stock.

